test/src/morphology/N-vorr_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - võrr â-stem: # Noun 'nest' - full paradigm
     võrr+N+Sg+Nom: võrr
     võrr+N+Sg+Gen: võõr
     võrr+N+Sg+Acc: võõr
     võrr+N+Sg+Ill: võˊrre
     võrr+N+Sg+Loc: võõrâst
     võrr+N+Sg+Com: võõrin
     võrr+N+Ess: võrrân
     võrr+N+Par: võrrâd
     võrr+N+Sg+Abe: võõrtää
     võrr+N+Pl+Nom: võõr
     võrr+N+Pl+Gen: võõri
     võrr+N+Pl+Acc: võõrid
     võrr+N+Pl+Ill: võõrid
     võrr+N+Pl+Loc: võõrin
     võrr+N+Pl+Com: võõrivuiˊm
     võrr+N+Pl+Abe: võõritää
